Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.310

Health care authority contracts—Compensation of staff in outpatient competency restoration programs.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the health care authority shall require the programs it contracts with to increase compensation for staff in outpatient competency restoration programs to provide compensation at competitive levels to improve recruitment and allow for the full implementation of outpatient competency restoration programs.

[ 2023 c 453 s 15.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.